pl: Stopień prażenia kakao: Ciemne; Jasne; Średnie; Surowe/niepalone; Inne
cs: Stupeň pražení kakaa: Tmavé; Světlé; Střední; Syrové/nepražené; Jiné
ko: 카카오 로스팅 강도: 다크; 라이트; 미디엄; 생/비로스팅; 기타
ro-RO: Nivelul de prăjire pentru boabele de cacao: Intensă; Ușoară; Medie; Crud/neprăjit; Altele
it: Livello di tostatura del cacao: Scuro; Chiaro; Medio; Crudo/non tostato; Altro
de: Kakaoröstgrad: Dunkel; Hell; Mittel; Roh/Ungeröstet; Sonstige
nb: Nivå på brenningsgraden på kakao: Mørk; Lys; Medium; Rå/ubrent; Annet
en: Cacao roast level: Dark; Light; Medium; Raw/unroasted; Other
fi: Kaakaon paahtoaste: Tumma; Vaalea; Keskipaahtoinen; Raaka/paahtamaton; Muu
hr-HR: Stupanj prženja kakaa: Tamno; Svijetlo; Srednje; Sirovo/neprženo; Ostalo
ja: カカオの焙煎度: ダーク; ライト; ミディアム; 生/無焙煎; その他
bg-BG: Степен на изпичане на какао: Тъмно; Светло; Средно; Сурово/неизпечено; Други
da: Kakaoristningsniveau: Mørk; Lys; Mellem; Rå/uristet; Andet
vi: Mức độ rang cacao: Đậm; Nhẹ; Trung bình; Thô/chưa rang; Khác
tr: Kakao kavurma seviyesi: Koyu; Açık; Orta; Çiğ/kavrulmamış; Diğer
pt-PT: Nível de torrefação do cacau: Escuro; Claro; Médio; Cru/não torrado; Outro
nl: Cacao brandingsgraad: Donker; Licht; Medium; Rauw/ongebrand; Overig
fr: Niveau de torréfaction du cacao: Foncée; Légère; Moyenne; Cru/non torréfié; Autre
sl-SI: Stopnja praženja kakava: Temno; Svetlo; Srednje; Surovo/nepraženo; Drugo
zh-CN: 可可豆烘焙程度: 深度烘焙; 浅度烘焙; 中度烘焙; 生豆/未烘焙; 其他
ru: Степень обжарки какао: Темная; Светлая; Средняя; Сырые / необжаренные; Другое
pt-BR: Nível de torra do cacau: Escuro; Claro; Médio; Cru/não torrado; Outro
lt-LT: Kakavos skrudinimo lygis: Tamsus; Šviesus; Vidutinis; Žalias / neskrudintas; Kita
zh-TW: 可可烘焙程度: 深焙; 淺焙; 中焙; 生/未烘焙; 其他
sk-SK: Stupeň praženia kakaa: Tmavé praženie; Svetlé praženie; Stredné praženie; Surové/nepražené; Iné
el: Επίπεδο καβουρδίσματος κακάο: Σκούρο; Ελαφρύ; Μέτριο; Ωμό/Ακαβούρδιστο; Άλλο
hu: Kakaó pörkölési szintje: Sötét; Világos; Közepes; Nyers/pörköletlen; Egyéb
th: ระดับการคั่วโกโก้: เข้ม; อ่อน; กลาง; ดิบ/ไม่ได้คั่ว; อื่นๆ
es: Nivel de tueste del cacao: Oscuro; Claro; Medio; Crudo/sin tostar; Otro
sv: Kakaorostningsnivå: Mörk; Ljus; Mellan; Rå/orostad; Övrigt